Alaska statutes. The Constitution of the State of Alaska
Article IX Finance and Taxation

Section 1. Taxing Power.

The power of taxation shall never be surrendered. This power shall not be suspended or contracted away, except as provided in this article.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The State of Alaska may not, by legislation or contract, bind the State to a tax structure for a proposed Alaska North Slope liquefied natural gas project in such a way as to prevent future legislatures from amending or repealing that tax structure. Under article IX, section 1 of the Alaska Constitution, the power of taxation cannot be surrendered. Thus, while the legislature can provide tax incentives or exemptions to encourage economic growth, those provisions must be under general law, and thus subject to amendment or repeal by a future legislature at any time. June 23, 2016 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 2. Nondiscrimination.

The lands and other property belonging to citizens of the United States residing without the State shall never be taxed at a higher rate than the lands and other property belonging to the residents of the State.

Section 3. Assessment Standards.

Standards for appraisal of all property assessed by the State or its political subdivisions shall be prescribed by law.

Section 4. Exemptions.

The real and personal property of the State or its political subdivisions shall be exempt from taxation under conditions and exceptions which may be provided by law. All, or any portion of, property used exclusively for non-profit religious, charitable, cemetery, or educational purposes, as defined by law, shall be exempt from taxation. Other exemptions of like or different kind may be granted by general law. All valid existing exemptions shall be retained until otherwise provided by law.

Opinions of attorney general. —

As an attribute of its sovereignty, the State of Alaska is immune from taxation of any kind. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

The constitutional Committee on Finance and Taxation has adequately clarified the ambiguity regarding the intended meaning of the state exemption provision of this section. The committee commentary with reference to this section states: “All property owned by the State and its subdivisions is exempt from taxation unless the legislature provides otherwise. An exception to tax immunity might be appropriate if a government engaged in what is normally a private business such as operating a ski resort, a moving picture theatre, or a swimming pool.” 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

State property is not subject to special assessments levied by local subdivisions of the state for improvements which benefit such property. 1966 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10.

Special assessments are usually distinguished from general taxation. Special assessments are levied for improvements which benefit particular individuals or property and are levied with reference to, and in proportion to, the special benefit conferred. General taxes, on the other hand, are imposed for the purpose of raising monies to be expended for governmental purposes without regard to special benefits conferred on a particular group or class of persons or property. 1966 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10.

A constitutional or statutory exemption from taxation is to be taken as an exemption from ordinary taxes, for the general purposes of government, state, county, or municipal; and does not relieve those in whose favor such exemption exists from the obligation to pay special assessments for local improvements which are charged upon property on the theory that such property is specially benefited thereby.
1966 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10.

Any exemption for state property from special assessment will have to be found separate and apart from this section. The obvious implication of AS

18.55.250

is that it is the policy of the legislature that public property used for essential public and government purposes is exempt from local special assessments. 1966 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10.

Immunity of state may be waived only by express constitutional or statutory declaration providing that the state shall be subject to particular tax provisions or to its tax statutes generally. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

The immunity of the state from taxation does not exempt third parties dealing with the state from payment of state taxes when the burden of taxation in a particular transaction falls upon that party and not upon the state; however, when the incidence of taxation falls clearly upon the state, there is no obligation on the part of the party dealing with the state to collect and pay over the tax to the state. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

The presumption that state tax laws are intended to apply to private activity only is equally applicable to instrumentalities and political subdivisions of the state. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

Municipal corporations are immune in the same manner and to the same degree as is the state itself. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

All religious property in the state not used for business, rent, or profit is exempt from taxation; however, property of a religious organization used for the production of income is taxable, but even in this situation a proration must be made with regard to the property involved, between those portions being used for business, rent or profit, and those with no such use. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 15.

Section 5. Interests in Government Property.

Private leaseholds, contracts, or interests in land or property owned or held by the United States, the State, or its political subdivisions, shall be taxable to the extent of the interests.

Section 6. Public Purpose.

No tax shall be levied, or appropriation of public money made, or public property transferred, nor shall the public credit be used, except for a public purpose.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The expenditure of state money in the construction of a hospital operated by a religious nonprofit group under the terms and conditions imposed by the federal government under the Hill-Burton Act is a public purpose and not prohibited by the constitution or laws of the state. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 19.

The Utility Reimbursement Law is constitutional. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 12.

The use of public resources for a partisan election campaign is not per se prohibited by the public purpose doctrine. However, the power of state officials to expend state money or use state property in support of a partisan position in an election campaign must be narrowly construed. April 15, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

In general, a municipality’s restricting use of a public facility to a particular race, ethnic group, or religion would violate AS

37.05.315

, the grant agreement, and, most importantly, the public purpose clause of this section. February 26, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 7. Dedicated Funds.

The proceeds of any state tax or license shall not be dedicated to any special purpose, except as provided in section 15 of this article or when required by the federal government for state participation in federal programs. This provision shall not prohibit the continuance of any dedication for special purposes existing upon the date of ratification of this section by the people of Alaska.

Cross references. —

For an exception to the prohibition against dedicated funds, see § 15 of this article which establishes the permanent fund.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective February 21, 1977 (9th Legislature’s SCS CSSSHJR 39 (Res) am S (1976)) inserted “as provided in section 15 of this article or” in the first sentence.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Among the reasons such a prohibition, as is found in this section, was recommended are the following: (1) flexibility of budgeting; (2) financial control; and (3) lack of relationship between the tax and purpose. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 7.

Delegates to the constitutional convention were desirous of eliminating dedications so that the legislature would have the greatest flexibility in allocating tax revenues on a basis of need. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 7.

A dedication encompasses (1) proceeds or part of the proceeds of a tax or license (2) set aside at a certain rate (3) for a particular purpose. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 7.

As a matter of compromise, a grandfather clause was included in this section to permit all dedications existing on the date of ratification of the constitution (April 24, 1956) to continue. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 7.

The intent of the drafters of the state constitution was to permit the continuance of existing dedications at the then existing rates until the legislature saw fit to exercise the only power retained in relation to them: That is, the power to repeal. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 7.

Any attempted alteration short of repeal is a nullity. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 7.

The prohibition against dedications should be read in conjunction with Alaska Const., art. XI, § 7, which deals with restrictions on the initiative and referendum. Therein it is stated that the initiative and referendum shall not be used to create or apply to dedications of “revenue.” 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 7.

Any attempted dedication of funds after April 26, 1956, which was not absolutely required for participation in federal programs, had to be covered into the general fund, any statute notwithstanding. 1959 Op. Att’y Gen. No. 7, issued prior to the 1977 amendment of this section.

Any repeal or repeal and re-enactment of a dedication during the 1957 session takes the dedication from under the protection of the grandfather clause, and a re-enactment either in 1957 or later is a nullity unless the dedication is required by the federal government for participation in federal programs. 1959 Op. Att’y Gen., No. 7, issued prior to the 1977 amendment of this section.

Existing dedications may be continued but may not be revised upward or downward by means of altering the tax, the rate of dedication or the purpose for which the dedication will be used. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 7; 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 9; 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 14.

No action of the legislature is permissible which would (1) tend to increase or decrease the percentage of the total tax and license proceeds which are dedicated, or (2) which would tend to increase or decrease the amount of proceeds which are dedicated. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 7; 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 14.

When the tax is lowered the entire dedication falls and all tax proceeds are covered into the general fund. This result is compelled by a realization that the lowering of the tax irretrievably lowers the dedication because insufficient revenues are available to maintain the present rate of the dedication. Since the only power retained by the legislature with respect to a dedication (other than administrative alterations in the management of the dedication) is the power of repeal, such irretrievable action is tantamount to a repeal of the dedication. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 14.

When the legislature raises the tax, the excess tax simply goes into the general fund. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 14.

The 1957 amendment to AS

43.40.010

, which reduced the tax on motor fuel used in commercial fishing crafts for purposes of commercial fishing from five cents to two cents per gallon, effected no change in the dedication inasmuch as the reduction in the tax is coupled with an exemption from the refund of three cents per gallon formerly allowed to users of fuel in commercial fishing craft for commercial purposes. Nothing has been done which increases or decreases the dedication. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 14.

Although fourth class cities may now be incorporated cities within the intent of AS

43.70.080

, they would not be entitled to any refunds under such section, since if this were the case, the effect of ch. 79, SLA 1959 would be to make a new dedication of a state tax or license for a special purpose. Any such dedication would be invalid under the provisions of this section. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 5.

If the moneys in the general fund must be applied in a particular way and the amount to be applied is determined by a set formula, rather than by each legislature’s judgment, the intent of this section has been thwarted. The legislature’s hands are tied as effectively as in the case where the proceeds of a particular tax are dedicated. 1969 Op. Att’y Gen. No. 5, overruled in part on other grounds, May 2, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

As to constitutionality of requiring a portion of the general fund to be allocated to local governments each year in accordance with a fixed formula, see 1969 Op. Att’y Gen. No. 5, overruled in part on other grounds, May 2, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

Employees’ retirement system and emoluments of office for all commissioners, heads of state agencies and the members of the judiciary and legislature are authorized by the Alaska Constitution and are implied exceptions to the prohibition of this section. 1969 Op. Att’y Gen., No. 5 overruled in part on other grounds, May 2, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

This section had two interrelated purposes: (1) to prevent any future dedication of revenues for special purposes, and (2) to prevent the creation of new special funds separate from the general fund. May 2, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

This section of the state constitution can be given its intended effect and serve its repeatedly expressed purpose only if the words “proceeds of any tax or license” are interpreted to mean what their framers clearly intended, i.e., the sources of any public revenues. May 2, 1975, Op. Att’y Gen.

The dedication of any source of public revenue: tax, license, rental, sale, bonus-royalty, royalty, or whatever, is limited by the state constitution to those existing when the constitution was ratified or required for participation in federal programs. May 2, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

The real concern at the constitutional convention was about earmarked funds, not taxes or licenses, but funds. May 2, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

Dedication of the revenues from the lease or sale of state natural resources offends the state constitutional prohibition against dedicated funds. May 2, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

The prohibition of this section is against new dedications, i.e., those dedications of revenues which did not exist on April 24, 1956, the date of the constitution’s ratification. June 2, 1978 Op. Att’y Gen.

Reducing a dedication makes it different from that which existed, i.e., an existing dedication is not continued when it is reduced any more than it is when it is increased. June 2, 1978 Op. Att’y Gen.

Legislation developed to eliminate the double fee paid by commercial fishermen who are also holders of limited entry permits, which in effect, exempted permit holders from license fees and provided for payment into the fishermen’s fund from moneys collected for permit fees of an amount equal to the amount which would have been paid into the fund from collections for commercial fishing licenses offends this section since it did not continue an existing dedication. June 2, 1978, Op. Att’y Gen.

A dedication is not repealed in its entirety by the partial elimination of its source but rather that it is reduced to provide for a dedication solely from all that is left of the source. June 2, 1978 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Violent Crimes Compensation Board is authorized by statute to recover, receive, and collect receipts; however, under the Alaska Constitution, all receipts must revert to the general fund. September 25, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

The practice of appropriating to a separate fund an amount to be ascertained by reference to receipts from a specified source does not violate the dedication prohibition of the constitution. November 30, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

Language of this section prohibiting dedication of proceeds of any state tax or license must be read as embodying certain implied exceptions, specifically, pension contributions, proceeds from bond issues, sinking fund receipts, revolving fund receipts, contributions from local government units for state-local cooperative programs, and tax receipts which the state might collect on behalf of local government units. November 30, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

There is no unlawful dedication involved in the return to a revolving loan fund of principal payments on loans. The initial appropriation would suffice to authorize the use of that money for other loans until the legislature reappropriates the unobligated assets of the fund or abolishes the fund. November 30, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

For discussion of issues involved in question of whether dedication prohibition applies to interest or other income earned by money appropriated to revolving funds and other funds and accounts, see November 30, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

The provisions of AS

16.43.310

and

16.43.320

, which authorize the Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission to establish and administer a buy-back program, offend the state constitutional prohibition against dedicated funds. May 23, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Pre-existing dedications of revenue established by statute to satisfy trust obligations imposed by federal law are excluded from the reach of Alaska Const., art. IX, § 17. That section applies to proceeds net of dedications otherwise permitted under this section, which permits dedications that are required for participation in a federal program. 1993 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1.

Section 8. State Debt.

No state debt shall be contracted unless authorized by law for capital improvements or unless authorized by law for housing loans for veterans, and ratified by a majority of the qualified voters of the State who vote on the question. The State may, as provided by law and without ratification, contract debt for the purpose of repelling invasion, suppressing insurrection, defending the State in war, meeting natural disasters, or redeeming indebtedness outstanding at the time this constitution becomes effective.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective December 24, 1982 (12th Legislature’s CSHJR 71 (St. Aff.)(1982)), inserted “or unless authorized by law for housing loans for veterans” in the first sentence.

Editor's notes. —

The amendment proposed by 2016 Legislative Resolve 53, SLA 2016, (SJR 2) (state debt for student loans) was rejected by voters.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Constitutional prohibitions against incurring indebtedness refer to obligations against the general credit of the state. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 39.

And not to obligations payable from a special tax or fund. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 39.

Since the state may allow an advance under the Reed Act to be repaid by the lessening of federal credits available to employers, it is apparent that the general credit of the state is not involved and consequently such an advance is not a state debt within the meaning of this section. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 39.

Section 9. Local Debts.

No debt shall be contracted by any political subdivision of the State, unless authorized for capital improvements by its governing body and ratified by a majority vote of those qualified to vote and voting on the question.

Section 10. Interim Borrowing.

The State and its political subdivisions may borrow money to meet appropriations for any fiscal year in anticipation of the collection of the revenues for that year, but all debt so contracted shall be paid before the end of the next fiscal year.

Section 11. Exceptions.

The restrictions on contracting debt do not apply to debt incurred through the issuance of revenue bonds by a public enterprise or public corporation of the State or a political subdivision, when the only security is the revenues of the enterprise or corporation. The restrictions do not apply to indebtedness to be paid from special assessments on the benefited property, nor do they apply to refunding indebtedness of the State or its political subdivisions.

Section 12. Budget.

The governor shall submit to the legislature, at a time fixed by law, a budget for the next fiscal year setting forth all proposed expenditures and anticipated income of all departments, offices, and agencies of the State. The governor, at the same time, shall submit a general appropriation bill to authorize the proposed expenditures, and a bill or bills covering recommendations in the budget for new or additional revenues.

Cross references. —

For the executive budget act, see AS 37.07.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The deadlines set out in AS

37.07.020

and

37.07.062

appear to be constitutional under this section. February 28, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 13. Expenditures.

No money shall be withdrawn from the treasury except in accordance with appropriations made by law. No obligation for the payment of money shall be incurred except as authorized by law. Unobligated appropriations outstanding at the end of the period of time specified by law shall be void.

Opinions of attorney general. —

It is the duty of the Department of Revenue to recover amounts erroneously refunded to a municipality. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 20.

This provision gives the legislature total and absolute power over the expenditure of state funds. February 28, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

The University of Alaska is similar in all or most respects to other state executive agencies for purposes of budgeting and accounting; it does not have any peculiar status by virtue of being constitutionally established. February 28, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Only rarely can an appropriation for state expenses be spent before the effective date of the law containing the appropriation. August 7, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Alaska Safety Advisory Council (ASAC) cannot legally spend program receipts without going through the state budgetary or other administrative process. By statute, program receipts must be deposited with the Department of Revenue. Authority to receive and expend funds for a state agency must be through legislative appropriation. ASAC is a state body and the purchase of goods and services by the ASAC must conform with the State Procurement Code. January 4, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 14. Legislative Post-Audit.

The legislature shall appoint an auditor to serve at its pleasure. He shall be a certified public accountant. The auditor shall conduct post-audits as prescribed by law and shall report to the legislature and to the governor.

Section 15. Alaska Permanent Fund.

At least twenty-five percent of all mineral lease rentals, royalties, royalty sale proceeds, federal mineral revenue sharing payments and bonuses received by the State shall be placed in a permanent fund, the principal of which shall be used only for those income-producing investments specifically designated by law as eligible for permanent fund investments. All income from the permanent fund shall be deposited in the general fund unless otherwise provided by law.

Cross references. —

For provisions governing the management of the Alaska permanent fund, see AS 37.13; for provisions concerning permanent fund dividends, see AS 43.23.

Effective dates. —

This section took effect February 21, 1977 (9th Legislature’s SCS CSSSHJR 39 (Res) am S (1976)).

Editor’s notes. —

The amendments and new subsection proposed by 2000 Legislative Resolve 54 (CCS SJR 34) (corporation and board members) were rejected by voters.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on House Joint Resolution No. 39 (CS SSHJR 39), SSHJR 39), see 1976 House Journal, p. 683.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Since this section specifically authorizes dedications to the Permanent Fund of “at least” 25 percent of certain revenues, any additional dedication to the fund by statute or by appropriation is also permissible. November 30, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

If the legislature enacts any other distribution program which is consistent with the intent of the permanent fund dividend law (AS 43.23), any appropriation to implement that program will be exempt from the appropriation limit of § 16, art. IX, of the state constitution. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 01.

The appropriation limit of section 16 of this article must be interpreted consistently with the permanent fund amendment contained in this section. Each legislature may reexamine existing law and enact different laws providing for the use of income earned by the Alaska permanent fund. If section 16 were interpreted so that the exception for permanent fund dividends applied only to appropriations to finance cash dividends under AS 43.23, the legislature would essentially be denied the flexibility to adjust to changing philosophies concerning the propriety of making cash payments directly to residents, which this section expressly reserves to it. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 01.

Section 16. Appropriation Limit.

Except for appropriations for Alaska permanent fund dividends, appropriations of revenue bond proceeds, appropriations required to pay the principal and interest on general obligation bonds, and appropriations of money received from a non-State source in trust for a specific purpose, including revenues of a public enterprise or public corporation of the State that issues revenue bonds, appropriations from the treasury made for a fiscal year shall not exceed $2,500,000,000 by more than the cumulative change, derived from federal indices as prescribed by law, in population and inflation since July 1, 1981. Within this limit, at least one-third shall be reserved for capital projects and loan appropriations. The legislature may exceed this limit in bills for appropriations to the Alaska permanent fund and in bills for appropriations for capital projects, whether of bond proceeds or otherwise, if each bill is approved by the governor, or passed by affirmative vote of three-fourths of the membership of the legislature over a veto or item veto, or becomes law without signature, and is also approved by the voters as prescribed by law. Each bill for appropriations for capital projects in excess of the limit shall be confined to capital projects of the same type, and the voters shall, as provided by law, be informed of the cost of operations and maintenance of the capital projects. No other appropriation in excess of this limit may be made except to meet a state of disaster declared by the governor as prescribed by law. The governor shall cause any unexpended and unappropriated balance to be invested so as to yield competitive market rates to the treasury.

Effective dates. —

This section took effect December 24, 1982 (12th Legislature’s FSS FCCSSJR 4 (1981)).

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section imposes an appropriation limit rather than a spending limit. The legislature may make appropriations which exceed available revenues, but obligations may not be paid under those appropriations unless there is enough surplus money available in the treasury. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 01.

There is history which supports a liberal interpretation of the term “capital project” as used in this section. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 01.

If the legislature enacts any other distribution program which is consistent with the intent of the permanent fund dividend law (AS 43.23), any appropriation to implement that program will be exempt from the appropriation limit of this section. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 01.

If the legislature provides that an appropriation may not be expended until a later fiscal year, the appropriation should be counted only against the limit for that later fiscal year. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 01.

The one-third appropriation allocation reserved for capital projects and loan appropriations may be disregarded when economic conditions impose a total appropriation limit which is more restrictive than that set out in this section. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 01.

Appropriations that are available for expenditure in a fiscal year should be counted only against the appropriation limit of this section for the first fiscal year during which they could be completely expended. This should be done even if an unexpended balance is carried forward into the next fiscal year; that balance must be considered obligated for the purposes of the appropriation limit. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 01.

Appropriations to retire municipal general obligation school bond indebtedness under AS 14.11 are “required” and qualify as an exception to the spending limit of this section. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 01.

Section 17. Budget Reserve Fund.

There is established as a separate fund in the State treasury the budget reserve fund. Except for money deposited into the permanent fund under Section 15 of this article, all money received by the State after July 1, 1990, as a result of the termination, through settlement or otherwise, of an administrative proceeding or of litigation in a State or federal court involving mineral lease bonuses, rentals, royalties, royalty sale proceeds, federal mineral revenue sharing payments or bonuses, or involving taxes imposed on mineral income, production, or property, shall be deposited in the budget reserve fund. Money in the budget reserve fund shall be invested so as to yield competitive market rates to the fund. Income of the fund shall be retained in the fund. Section 7 of this article does not apply to deposits made to the fund under this subsection. Money may be appropriated from the fund only as authorized under (b) or (c) of this section.

If the amount available for appropriation for a fiscal year is less than the amount appropriated for the previous fiscal year, an appropriation may be made from the budget reserve fund. However, the amount appropriated from the fund under this subsection may not exceed the amount necessary, when added to other funds available for appropriation, to provide for total appropriations equal to the amount of appropriations made in the previous calendar year for the previous fiscal year.

An appropriation from the budget reserve fund may be made for any public purpose upon affirmative vote of three-fourths of the members of each house of the legislature.

If an appropriation is made from the budget reserve fund, until the amount appropriated is repaid, the amount of money in the general fund available for appropriation at the end of each succeeding fiscal year shall be deposited in the budget reserve fund. The legislature shall implement this subsection by law.

Effective date. —

This section became effective on January 2, 1991 (16th Legislature’s HCS CSSSSJR 5 (Fin) am H (1990).)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Since this section clearly and unambiguously states that it applies to revenues received after July 1, 1990, it applies retrospectively to settlement proceeds received after the beginning of fiscal year 1990, even though the section did not take effect until January 2, 1991.
1992 Alas. Op. Att'y. Gen. No. 1 (April 24).

Pre-existing dedications of revenue established by statute to satisfy trust obligations imposed by federal law are excluded from the reach of this section, which applies to proceeds net of dedications otherwise permitted under
Alaska Const., art. IX, § 7, which permits dedications that are required for participation in a federal program.
1992 Alas. Op. Att’y. Gen. No. 1 (April 24).

The term “administrative proceeding” in this section does not include the informal conference process established by
AS

43.05.240

for the resolution of tax disputes. The section applies only to the proceeds of disputes that have progressed to an adjudicatory stage of the dispute resolution process.
1992 Alas. Op. Att’y. Gen. No. 1 (April 24).